District of Columbia statutes.
2-823

Appropriations; authorized; use.

There are hereby authorized to be appropriated such sums as may be necessary, payable in like manner as other appropriations for the expenses of the District of Columbia, to enable the Mayor to provide additional municipal services in said District during the inaugural period, including employment of personal services without regard to the civil-service and classification laws; travel expenses of enforcement personnel, including sanitarians, from other jurisdictions; hire of means of transportation; meals for policemen, firemen, and other municipal employees, cost of removing and relocating streetcar loading platforms, construction, rent, maintenance, and expenses, incident to the operation of temporary public comfort stations, first-aid stations, and information booths; and other incidental expenses in the discretion of the Mayor; and such sums as may be necessary, payable in like manner as other appropriations for the expenses of the Department of the Interior, to enable the Secretary of the Interior to provide meals for the members of the United States Park Police during the inaugural period.

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1049, ch. 974, § 3
Jan. 30, 1968, 82 Stat. 4, Pub. L. 90-251, § 2

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1803.
1973 Ed., § 1-1203.

Prior Codifications

The “civil-service and classification laws,” referred to near the beginning of the section, are set forth in Title 5 of the United States Code.

References in Text

Federal payment to the District of Columbia: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2356, the D.C. Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for payment to the District of Columbia, in lieu of reimbursements for expenses incurred in connection with Presidential inauguration activities, $5,702,000 as authorized by this section, which shall be apportioned by the Chief Financial Officer within the various appropriations in the act.

Editor's Notes

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government